third_party/hyphenation-patterns/src/de/hyph-de-1901.pat.txt
yl1a2c
y2l1a2m
yla2n
y3lant
yl4ante
yl4anti
y4lantr
y3lat
ylau2
yl3c
yle2
y4le.
yl1em
y2l1es
y2l1et
yli4n
yl2lo2
yl2lö2
yloi4
yloid1
yloni1
yl1ora
ym4a
ym4e
ymp2
ym2pha
ympi1
yn2eu
yn3k2
y2n1o
yno4d
yno2t
yob2
yoga3
yom4
yon2a
yon4i
y1ont
y1os
y2ost
y1ou
2y1p
ypa2
yp1ab3
yp1an
yp2e2
y2pf
y2p1i2d
y2p1in
y2p3l
ypo3
y4p3s
yp3t
ypu2
y2p1um
y1q
y1r
yra3k
y3r2e
y3ri
yri2a
yri1e
yri3en
y3ro
yro6ste
yrr2
y1s
ys2an
ys2c
ys2e1
ysein2
y3s2h
y4s3l
ysme3
ys2o
ys2pa
ys2pi
yst2e
yst4h
ys2tra
y4stro
y3s2ty
ysu2
y2sur
y3s2z
y1t2
y2te.
y2tes
yt4h
ythe1
y3to
y4t3r
yt3t
y1u2r
y1v
y1w
y1y
y1z2
yzer2
2z1a2b
zab3l
za1cha
za1chä
2z1a2d
2z1af
za3gr
3z2ah
zah3le
zah4ner4
2z3ak
4zakk
2z1al
3zali
2z1a2m
z1a2n
z2an.
4za4na
2zanb
za3ne
2zanf
2zangs
3z2ank
zan2ka
2zanr
zanti1
za4pf
z1aq
z1ar
3zar.
2zarb
2zarm
3z2aro
zar2tr
2z1as
za4sc
za3st4
2z1aß
z3at
zat2e
za2to
3zaub
z1au2f
2z3aug
3zaun
z3aur
2z1aut
2z1äc
z2äh
2z1äm
z1än
z1äp
z1är
2z1äus
2zäuß
4z3b4
zbe3r2e
zbü1b
zbübe3
2z3c
2z3d2
zdan2
zdä1
3ze.
zeau3
zeaus4
2z1e2ben
2z1echo
ze1e2
zeeu3
2z1eff
z1e2ga
zehe4
zehen1
zeh2l
ze3ho
z2ei1f4
zeil2
zei3la
zeile4
2z1ein
ze3in.
zeinbus6
z2e1ind
zei4ne
z2eino
ze3inse
ze2i3s2
zeist4
3zeit
zei2t1a
zei4t3er
zei2tr
zeit3ri
ze2l1a
zela2d
zelau2
ze2l1ä
zel3d
2ze2lek
2zelem
ze2len
ze2l1er
ze2l1in
2z1e2lit
zel3la
zel4l3ac
zel2lä
zel4leh
zel6lein
zel6ler6t
zelli4n
zelm4
ze2l1o
zels2
zel3sa
zel3sz
zelu2
zembe2
2z1emp
5zen.
ze4n1ac
ze4nas
zen3au
ze3n2em
zenen1
4zenge.
z4engl
2zengp
zen3n
ze2n3o
ze4not
4zensem
zens2p
zen4tha
z2entn
zent3s
2zentw
2zentz
ze2nu
zen4z3er
zen2zw
zeo4r
3z2er.
zer3a
ze1ral
zere2b
z2erfe
z2erga
2z1ergä
4z3ergeb
z4erges
z4ergl
zer4gon
2zergu
z2erhe
2z3erhö
ze3ri
zerin6te
z2erko
3zerl.
zer4lau
zer4le.
4zerleb
zer4len
2zerlö
3z2ern
zer4nan
zer4n3e4b
zer4nei
2z1erö
zer2öf
2z1erq
4z3erreg
z2ers.
2z1er4sa
zerta2
zer4t3ag
zert4an
zer6tere
zer6terl
zer4tin
zer2to
6z5ertrag
zer6trau
z1erwe
2z1erz
zer2ze
4z3erzi
ze2s
3zes.
ze3sc
zes1e
zes3er
ze4s3po
ze4spr
zes2sa
zes4sei
zessen4
zes6s5end
zes4ser4
zes2sp
ze3sta
zes2th
ze2ß1
2zeta
2z1e2th
ze2tr
2zetts
zeu2g3r
2z1eul
ze1ur
2z1e2x1
2z3f4
zfäs3
zfeue2
2z3g4
zgang5
zger2a
zger2s1
2z1h2
z2hen
zhir3
3zi.
zial5l
zi3ar
zich2o
zi2dei
zid3r
zie4ler
zie2l1i
zi1erh
zi1es
zi3ess
3zig
3z2il
zil2e
zill2
z2imm
2zimp
zim2t3
2z1ind
zin2e
zin3ei
2z1inf
z1inh
zi4n3in
zin1it
2z1inj
zin2na
zin4o
zin2sa
zin4ser
4zinsuf
z1inv
zi2o3
zirk2
zirk6s
2z1i2so
zisse4
zis4t
zistras6
zi3s2z
zi2tan
zite4
zithe2
zi2t1o4
ziv2
2z1j
4z1k4
2z1l2
z3ly
2z1m2
zmas6sen
zme2e
2z3n2
z3oas
2z1ob
z1of
zo2gl
2z1oh
zolla2
zol3le
zol4lei
zoller4
zol6lert
zol2li2
zon3au
zon3s4
zon4t3er
zo2o
2zope
2z1o2r
zo3re
3z2orn
zor4ne
2z1osz
2z1ou
2zö2f
2z1ök
z1öl
zö4le
3z2öll
2zöls
2zön
2z3p4
2z1q
2z3r2
4z1s2
z3sa
zsau2
z3sh
z3sk
zspor2
z3str
z3sz
2z1t
zta2n
zt3ane
z2t1au
ztein1
zt3eins
zt2el
z2t1ent
z2t1erz
z3tes
zte3str
zt3he
z3t4hem
z3t4her
zt3hi
zt3ho
z3thr
z3thy
zt3rec
zt3s
zu3a
zu1ä2
zub4
zubus2
3zuc
zuch2e
zud4
zudi4
zu2el
zu3e2r1
zu3f4
zu2gar
zu4gent
zu3g1l
zu4gla
zu4glö
zug4ste
zug1un
2z1uhr
zu3hu
zu1i2
zu3k
zul2
2z1um.
zum2a
2z1umb
zumen2
2zumf
2zumg
zum2i
2zuml
2zumr
2z1ums
zum2u
2zunab
zun2e
2z1unem
4zunget
2z1ungl
z1uni
2zu2nio
2zuniv
2zunr
2z1uns
2zunt
zuo2
zup2fi
zu3pl
zu3r4a
2z1urk
2z1url
2z1urn
2z1urs
2z1urt
zu3s2
zusch4
zu3t2
zut4r
zut4u
zut3z
zuz2
2zü4b
3züc
zür1c
2z1v
zw2
z1wac
2zwag
2zwah
2zwal
2zwap
z1war
2zwa2s
2zwäs
2z1wed
2zweg
2zweh
z2weig
2zweil
zwei3s
zweiter6
2z1wel
2z1wen
2z1wer
2z1wes
z2wic
zwi4e
3zwing
2zwirt
z2wisc
2zwiss
z2wit
2z1wo
z1wör
z1wur
2z1wü
zy1an.
zy2le4
4z1z
z3z2a
zza3b4
z4z3al
zz4at
zze3s
z2z1id
zzin1
zz1ini
zz2ö
zzug4s
